Hawaii, session 2026, HB545.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the department of human resources development currently provides on-demand or facilitator-led presentations and soft skill training in areas such as leadership, coaching, and conflict resolution, as well as human resources-related trainings to all departments.  However, the legislature further finds that the department of human resources development requires additional positions to develop and provide training that addresses the area-specific needs of the other executive departments. The legislature appreciates all state employees, and values the vital work these employees perform for the people of Hawaii. The legislature recognizes the importance of investing in the professional development of state employees so these employees may continue to excel in their various roles.  The legislature believes that establishing additional positions to increase the development opportunities provided by the department of human resources development will enhance the professional lives of the state employees. Accordingly, the purpose of this act is to appropriate funds to the department of human resources development for: (1)  The establishment of positions to expand the department's ability to offer professional development programs for state employees; and (2)  The design and implementation of a leadership training module for manager level positions to promote interdepartmental collaboration to develop innovative solutions for the state's pressing issues. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the establishment of: (1)  Two permanent full-time equivalent (2.0 FTE) human resource specialist positions; and (2)  One permanent full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) human resource technician position, to expand the ability of the training branch of the employee relations division to offer professional development programs for state employees. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of human resources development for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $100,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the development and implementation of a leadership training module for manager level employees to promote interdepartmental collaboration for the development of innovative solutions for pressing issues in the state. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of human resources development for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________